Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,225
Toxic chemical release form.

(1) The owner or operator of a facility subject to the requirements of this section shall complete a toxic chemical release form as published under section 313(g) of Title III for each toxic chemical that was manufactured, processed, or otherwise used in quantities exceeding the toxic chemical threshold quantity established by subsection (2) of this section during the preceding calendar year at such facility. The form shall be submitted to the director annually on July 1 and shall contain data reflecting releases during the preceding calendar year.

(2) The requirements of this section apply to owners and operators of facilities that are required to file reports under section 313 of Title III and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 35.